en: Sterlet caviar
de: Sterlet Kaviar
fr: Caviar sterlet, Acipenser ruthenus
hr: Kavijar od sterleta

en: Nut and seed mixes, nuts and seeds mixes, Mixes of nuts and seeds
nl: Noten en zaden mengsels

en: Dried fruit and seed mixes
fr: Mélange de graines et fruits secs
nl: Gedroogd fruit en zaden mengsels

en: Cereals and potatoes
bg: Зърнени храни и картофи
ca: Cereals i patates
cs: Obiloviny a brambory
da: Korn og kartofler
de: Getreide und Kartoffeln
el: Δημητριακά και πατάτες
es: Cereales y patatas
fi: Viljat ja perunat
fr: Céréales et pommes de terre
he: דגנים ותפוחי אדמה
hr: Žitarice i krumpir
hu: Gabona és burgonyafélék
id: Sereal dan kentang
it: Cereali e patate
ja: 穀物とジャガイモ
ko: 곡물과 감자
lt: Grūdai ir bulvės
nl: Granen en aardappels
no: Korn og poteter
pl: Zboża i ziemniaki
pt: Cereais e batatas
ro: Cereale și cartofi
ru: Зерновые и картофель
sv: Spannmål och potatis
th: ธัญพืชและมันฝรั่ง
tr: Tahıllar ve patates
uk: Зернові та картопля
zh: 谷物和土豆

en: Yam potatoes
fr: Ignames
hr: Jam krumpir
ja: ヤムイモ, ヤム芋, ヤム

en: Fresh yam potatoes
fr: Ignames frais

en: Peeled boiled yam potato, Peeled yam potato cooked in water, Peeled boiled Indian potato, Peeled Indian potato cooked in water
fr: Igname épluchée bouillie, Igname épluchée cuite à l'eau

en: Potato gnocchi, Gnocchi from potato
da: Kartoffelgnocchier
de: Kartoffelgnocchi
es: Gnocchi de patata
fi: perunagnocchi
fr: Gnocchi de pommes de terre, Gnocchi à la pomme de terre
hr: Njoke od krumpira
it: gnocchi di patate
nl: Aardappelgnocchi
sv: Potatisgnocchi

en: Cooked gnocchis from potato
da: Kogte kartoffelgnocchier
fr: Gnocchi de pommes de terre cuits, Gnocchis à la pomme de terre cuits
hr: Kuhani njoki od krumpira
nl: Gekookte aardappelgnocchis
sv: Kokta potatisgnocchi

en: Cereals and their products, Cereals
bg: Зърнени продукти
ca: Cereals i derivats
cs: obiloviny
da: Korn og kornprodukter
de: Getreideprodukte, Getreide und Getreideprodukte, Getreide
es: Cereales y derivados, Cereales y sus productos, Cereales
fi: Viljat ja viljatuotteet
fr: Céréales et dérivés, Céréales
he: דגן ומוצריו
hr: Žitarica i njihovih proizvoda
hu: Gabonafélék és azok termékei
it: Cereali e i loro prodotti, Cereali
lt: Grūdai ir jų produktai
nl: Granen en graanproducten
no: Korn og kornprodukter, Korn
pl: Zboża i produkty zbożowe, zboża
pt: Cereais e seus produtos
ru: Зерновые продукты
sv: Spannmål och deras produkter
th: ผลิตภัณฑ์จากธัญพืช, ธัญพืช
tr: Tahıl ve tahıl ürünleri
uk: Зернові продукти
vi: Ngũ cốc và sản phẩm từ ngũ cốc
zh: 谷物及其制品

en: Cereal variety packs
de: Getreidemischpackungen
es: Paquetes variados de cereales - productos en grano y legumbres
fr: Assortiments de céréales - grains et légumes secs
hr: Pakiranja raznih žitarica
it: Confezioni miste di cereali - grano e legumi
nl: Graanproductassortimenten
pt: Pack variados de cereais - grãos - leguminosas secas

en: Cereal grains
ca: Grans de cereal
de: Getreidekörner, Getreidesamen
es: Cereales en grano
fi: viljatuotteet
fr: Céréales en grains
he: מדגנים
hr: Zrna žitarica
hu: Gabonamagvak
it: Semi di cereale
lt: Javų grūdai
nl: Graankorrels
pl: Ziarna zbóż
pt: Grãos de cereais
ru: Злаковое зерно
zh: 麦片谷物

en: Canary grass
de: Kanarische Samen
es: Alpiste
fr: Alpiste
hr: Kanarinska trava
la: Phalaris canariensis
lt: Kanarų žolė
nl: Kanariezaden

en: Amaranth
ar: الامارانت
bg: амарант
cs: amarant
de: Amaranth, Amarant
es: Amaranto
fi: meksikonrevonhäntä, amarantti
fr: Amarante
hr: Amarant
hu: disznóparéj, amaránt
it: Amaranto
la: Amaranthus
lt: Amarantas
nl: Amaranth
ro: amarant
sk: amarant
sr: амарант
zh: 苋菜籽

en: Oat
bg: Овес
de: Hafer, Echter Hafer
es: Avena sativa
fi: kaura
fr: Avoines
he: שיבולת שועל
hr: zobene
it: Avena
la: Avena sativa
lt: Avižos
nl: Havers
tr: Yulaf
zh: 燕麦

en: Barley
bg: Ечемик
de: Gerste
es: Cebada
fi: Ohra
fr: Orge
hr: Jedva
it: Orzo
ja: オオムギ, 大麦
la: Hordeum vulgare
lt: Miežiai
nl: Gerst
zh: 大麦

en: Winter barley
de: Wintergerste
es: Cebada de invierno
fr: Escourgeon
hr: Ozimi ječam
la: Hordeum vulgare subsp. hexastichum
lt: Žieminiai miežiai
nl: Wintergerst

en: Whole barley
fr: Orge entière

en: Pearled barley
fr: Orge perlée

en: Arpacas
fr: Arpacas